New Jersey, session 221, A118.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   For privilege periods commencing on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2020, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the corporation business tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), in an amount equal to 15 percent of qualified wages paid in the privilege period to a qualified disabled veteran in the course of sustained employment.  Provided however, for a privilege period the credit shall not be allowed in an amount exceeding $1,800 for each qualified disabled veteran. (1)   The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period shall be as prescribed by the director. The amount of the credit applied pursuant to this section, added together with any other credit allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), shall not exceed 50 percent of the tax liability otherwise due and shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). Unused credit resulting from the limitations of this paragraph (1) may be carried forward, if necessary, for use in the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the credit is allowed. (2)   A taxpayer shall not be granted a credit pursuant to this section for the qualified wages paid to a qualified disabled veteran in a privilege period if the qualified wages of the qualified disabled veteran or the job providing qualified wages to the qualified disabled veteran is included in the calculation of another credit against any State tax or grant for a period of time that coincides with the applicable privilege period. (3)   If the director determines that a taxpayer is displacing employees and replacing the employees with qualified disabled veterans for the primary purposes of obtaining the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the director shall deny the taxpayer the credit allowed under this section and shall issue a tax assessment for the recapture of credit previously allowed to the taxpayer under this section plus an assessment of 50 percent of any credit subject to recapture as penalty. (4)   A taxpayer may apply to the director for a tax credit transfer certificate in lieu of applying any amount of the credit provided pursuant to this section against its tax liability.  The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the taxpayer from the director, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to any other taxpayer that may have a tax liability under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) in exchange for private financial consideration to be provided by the purchaser or assignee to the taxpayer that is eligible for the credit.  The certificate provided to the taxpayer shall include a statement waiving the taxpayers right to claim that amount of the credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) that the taxpayer has elected to sell or assign.  The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the taxpayer of less than 75 percent of the transferred credit amount.  Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a credit provided by this section. b.    As used in this section: Qualified disabled veteran means a resident of this State initially hired by the taxpayer on or after the date of enactment of this act who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service, occurring on or after January 1, 1990, in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or greater. Qualified wages mean any salaries, wages and remuneration subject to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., paid to a qualified disabled veteran on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2020, for labor rendered in service to an enterprise of the taxpayer. Sustained employment means a period of time no less than 185 business days during the privilege period in which a qualified disabled veteran is earning qualified wages. 2.    a.   For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2020, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 15 percent of qualified wages paid in the taxable year to a qualified disabled veteran in the course of sustained employment.  Provided however, for a taxable year the credit shall not be allowed in an amount exceeding $1,800 for each qualified disabled veteran. (1)   A credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not reduce the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., for a taxable year to less than zero. Unused credit resulting from the limitations of this paragraph (1) may be carried forward if necessary to the seven taxable years following the taxable year for which the credit was allowed.  The form and method of carry forward shall be as prescribed by the director. A business entity that is classified as a partnership for federal income tax purposes shall not be allowed a credit directly, but the amount of credit of a taxpayer in respect of a distributive share of partnership income, shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the credit acquired by the partnership that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the partnership for its taxable year ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. A New Jersey S Corporation shall not be allowed a credit directly under the gross income tax, but the amount of credit of a taxpayer in respect of a pro rata share of S Corporation income, shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the credit acquired by the New Jersey S Corporation that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total pro rata share of S Corporation income of the New Jersey S Corporation for its privilege period ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. (2)   A taxpayer shall not be granted a credit pursuant to this section for the qualified wages paid to a qualified disabled veteran in a taxable year if the qualified wages of the qualified disabled veteran or the job providing qualified wages to the qualified disabled veteran is included in the calculation of another credit against any State tax or grant for a period of time that coincides with the applicable taxable year. (3)   If the director determines that a taxpayer is displacing employees and replacing the employees with qualified disabled veterans for the primary purposes of obtaining the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the director shall deny the taxpayer the credit allowed under this section and shall issue a tax assessment for the recapture of credit previously allowed to the taxpayer under this section plus an assessment of 50 percent of any credit subject to recapture as penalty. (4)   A taxpayer may apply to the director for a tax credit transfer certificate in lieu of applying any amount of the credit provided pursuant to this section against its tax liability.  The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the taxpayer from the director, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to any other taxpayer that may have a tax liability under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in exchange for private financial consideration to be provided by the purchaser or assignee to the taxpayer that is eligible for the credit.  The certificate provided to the taxpayer shall include a statement waiving the taxpayers right to claim that amount of the credit against the tax imposed pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., that the taxpayer has elected to sell or assign. The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the taxpayer of less than 75 percent of the transferred credit amount.  Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a credit provided by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this section. b.    As used in this section: Qualified disabled veteran means a resident of this State initially hired by the taxpayer on or after the date of enactment of this act who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service, occurring on or after January 1, 1990, in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or greater. Qualified wages mean any salaries, wages and remuneration subject to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., paid to a qualified disabled veteran on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2020 for labor rendered in service to an enterprise of the taxpayer. Sustained employment means a period of time no less than 185 business days during the taxable year in which a qualified disabled veteran is earning qualified wages. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.